North Dakota, session 69, SB2057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 12.1-32-08 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. When the restitution ordered by the court under subsection 1 is the result of a finding that the
defendant issued a check or draft without sufficient funds or without an account, the court shall
impose as costs the greater of the sum of tentwenty dollars or an amount equal to twenty-five
percent of the amount of restitution ordered. The costs imposed under this subsection,
however, may not exceed one thousand dollars. The state-employed clerks of district court
shall remit the funds collected as costs under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit
in the restitution collection assistance fund. The funds deposited into the restitution collection
assistance fund are appropriated to the judicial branch on a continuing basis for the purpose
of defraying expenses incident to the collection of restitution, including operating expenses
and the compensation of additional necessary personnel. The state's attorneys and
county-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under this
subsection to the county treasurer to be deposited in the county general fund.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 27-03-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-03-05. Fees to be charged and collected by clerk of supreme court.
The clerk of the supreme court shall charge and collect in advance a fee of one hundred
twenty-fivetwo hundred fifty dollars upon the filing in the supreme court of the record in any cause upon
appeal or upon the filing in the court of a petition in any cause seeking the exercise of the original
court's jurisdiction. In addition to the fee required by this section, the clerk of the supreme court shall
charge and collect any electronic filing processing fee established by court rule for any matter filed in an
electronic format.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 27-05.2-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-05.2-03. Fees to be charged by the clerk of the district court.
1. A clerk of the district court shall charge and collect the following fees in civil cases:
a. For filing a case for decision that is not a small claims actionunder subdivision b or e,
eightyone hundred sixty dollars.
(1) FifteenThirty dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the state
treasurer for deposit in the civil legal services fund. Any fees collected under this
paragraph which exceed seven hundred fifty thousandnine hundred thousand
dollars in any biennium must be paid by the clerk of court to the state treasurer for
deposit in the state general fund.

S. B. NO. 2057 - PAGE 2
(2) For the filing of a petition for dissolution of marriage, annulment, or separation from
bed and board, fifty dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the state
treasurer for deposit in the displaced homemaker account created by section
14-06.1-14 and fifteen dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.
(3) For all other filings, sixty-fiveOne hundred thirty dollars of this fee must be paid by
the clerk of court to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.
b. For filing a petition for dissolution of marriage, annulment, or separation, one hundred
sixty dollars.
(1) Thirty dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the state treasurer for
deposit in the civil legal services fund. Any fees collected under this paragraph
which exceed nine hundred thousand dollars in any biennium must be paid by the
clerk of court to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.
(2) One hundred dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the state
treasurer for deposit in the displaced homemaker account under section 14 - 06.1 - 14 .
(3) Thirty dollars of this fee must be paid by the clerk of court to the state treasurer for
deposit in the state general fund.
c. For filing an answer to a case that is not a small claims actionother than under
subdivision d or e, fiftyone hundred dollars. The clerk shall deposit this fee with the state
treasurer for deposit in the general fund in the state treasury.
d. For filing a motion to modify an order for spousal support, property division, child support,
parental rights and responsibilities, residential responsibility, parenting time, one hundred
sixty dollars. For filing an answer to a motion to modify an order for spousal support,
property division, child support, parental rights and responsibilities, residential
responsibility, or parenting time, one hundred dollars. The clerk shall deposit this fee with
the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund of the state treasury.
c.e. For filing a small claims action in district court, tentwenty dollars.
d.f. For filing any matter authorized to be filed in the office of the clerk of court other than
under subdivision a, b, or c, tentwenty dollars.
e.g. For preparing, certifying, issuing, or transmitting any document, tentwenty dollars, or a
lesser fee as may be set by the state court administrator.
f. For filing a motion or an answer to a motion to modify an order for alimony, property
division, child support, or child custody, thirty dollars. The clerk shall deposit this fee with
the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund of the state treasury.
2. Section 27-01-07 applies to fees charged under this section. The clerk of court may not
charge or collect any fee, prescribed by this or any other section, from the state or an agency
thereof or from a political subdivision or agency thereof.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 29-26-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
29-26-22. Judgment for fines - Court administration fee - Community service supervision fee
- Special funds - Docketing and enforcement. (Retroactive application - See note)
1. In all criminal cases except infractions, upon a plea or finding of guilt, the court shall impose a
court administration fee in lieu of the assessment of court costs. The court administration fee
must include a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars for a class B misdemeanor, two hundred

S. B. NO. 2057 - PAGE 3
dollars for a class A misdemeanor, four hundred dollars for a class C felony, six hundred fifty
dollars for a class B felony, and nine hundred dollars for a class A or AA felony.
2. In addition, in all criminal cases except infractions, the court administration fee must
includethe court shall impose an indigent defense and court facilities fee of one hundred
dollars. Of the additional one hundred dollar court administration fee, the first seven hundred
fifty thousand dollars collected per biennium must be deposited in the indigent defense
administration fund, which must be used for indigent defense services in this state, and the
next four hundred sixty thousand dollars collected per biennium must be deposited in the court
facilities improvement and maintenance fund. After the minimum thresholds have been
collected, one-half of the additional court administration fee must be deposited in each fund.
3. In addition to any court administration fees that may be imposed under subsections 1 and 2,
the court shall impose upon each defendant who receives a sentence that includes community
service a community service supervision fee of twenty-five dollars. The community service
supervision fee must be deposited in the community service supervision fund. The fees
deposited in this fund must be used to provide community service supervision grants subject
to legislative appropriations.
4. A court may waive the court administration fee, indigent defense and court facilities fee, or
community service supervision fee upon a showing of indigency as provided in section
25-03.1-13. District court administration fees, exclusive of amounts deposited in the indigent
defense administration fund and the court facilities and improvement fund, and forfeitures
must be deposited in the state general fund. A judgment that the defendant pay a fine or fees,
or both, may be docketed and if docketed constitutes a lien upon the real estate of the
defendant in like manner as a judgment for money rendered in a civil action. The court may
allow the defendant to pay any assessed administration fee or community service supervision
fee in installments. When a defendant is assessed administration fees or a community service
supervision fee, the court may not impose at the same time an alternative sentence to be
served if the fees are not paid.
5. Upon successful completion of an approved adult drug court program, a court may waive all
unpaid fines, fees, and costs imposed in the criminal judgment sentencing the defendant to
the drug court program, except for restitution. For purposes of this subsection, "approved drug
court program" means a district court-supervised treatment program approved by the supreme
court.

S. B. NO. 2057 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2057.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 64 Nays 24 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State